Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB670.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. KRS 158.178 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly finds that:
(a) In 2005, the Supreme Court of the United States recognized that it is
permissible to display the Ten Commandments on government property in
Van Orden v. Perry, 545 U.S. 677 (2005);
(b) In 2019, the Supreme Court of the United States further recognized that the
Ten Commandments "have historical significance as one of the foundations
of our legal system...." in American Legion v. American Humanist
Association, 588 U.S. 29 (2019), and also ruled that the display of the Ten
Commandments on public property may have "multiple purposes" such as
"historical significance" and to represent a "common cultural heritage";
(c) Recognizing the historical role of the Ten Commandments accords with our
nation's history and faithfully reflects the understanding of the founders of
our nation with respect to the necessity of civic morality to a functional self-
government;
(d) Including the Ten Commandments in the education of our children is part
of our state and national history, culture, and tradition;
(e) The text of the Ten Commandments set forth in this section is identical to
the text of the Ten Commandments monument that was upheld by the
Supreme Court of the United States in Van Orden v. Perry, 545 U.S. 677
(2005);
(f) The Mayflower Compact of 1620 was America's first written constitution
and made a Covenant with Almighty God to "form a civil body politic."
This was the first purely American document of self-governance and
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/16/2026 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1565
affirmed the link between civil society and God;
(g) The decision set forth by the Supreme Court of the United States in Van
Orden v. Perry, 545 U.S. 677 (2005) ensures that the students in our public
schools may understand and appreciate the foundational documents of our
state and national government;
(h) The Supreme Court of the United States acknowledged that the Ten
Commandments may be displayed on local government property when a
private donation is made for the purchase of the historical monument in
Pleasant Grove City, Utah v. Summum, 555 U.S. 460 (2009); and
(i) It is the intent of the General Assembly that this section shall not create an
unfunded mandate, and local boards of education are encouraged to use
documents that are printed and made available to the schools free of
charge.
(2) No later than January 1, 2027, a public school or public charter school shall
conspicuously display the Ten Commandments in each classroom. The nature of
the display shall be determined by each school with a minimum requirement that
the text of the Ten Commandments:
(a) Be displayed on a poster or framed document that is at least sixteen (16)
inches by twenty (20) inches;
(b) Be the central focus of the poster or framed document and shall be printed
in a large, easily readable font;
(c) Read as follows:
"The Ten Commandments
I AM the LORD thy God.
Thou shalt have no other gods before me.
Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images.
Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain.
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/16/2026 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1565
Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.
Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon the land which the
Lord thy God giveth thee.
Thou shalt not kill.
Thou shalt not commit adultery.
Thou shalt not steal.
Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's house.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's wife, nor his manservant, nor his maidservant, nor
his cattle, nor anything that is thy neighbor's."; and
(d) Contain a context statement, as follows:
"The History of the Ten Commandments in American Public Education
The Ten Commandments were a prominent part of American public education for
almost three centuries. Around the year 1688, The New England Primer became the
first published American textbook and was the equivalent of a first grade reader. The
New England Primer was used in public schools throughout the United States for more
than one hundred fifty years to teach Americans to read and contained more than forty
questions about the Ten Commandments. The Ten Commandments were also included
in public school textbooks published by educator William McGuffey, a noted university
president and professor. A version of his famous McGuffey Readers was written in the
early 1800s and became one of the most popular textbooks in the history of American
education, selling more than one hundred million copies. Copies of the McGuffey
Readers are still available today. The Ten Commandments also appeared in textbooks
published by Noah Webster which were widely used in American public schools along
with America's first comprehensive dictionary that Webster also published. His
textbook, The American Spelling Book, contained the Ten Commandments and sold
more than one hundred million copies for use by public school children all across the
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/16/2026 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1565
nation and was still available for use in American public schools in the year 1975."
(3) A public school or public charter school shall not use public funds to purchase
the displays required by this section. A public school or public charter school
shall only accept donated displays that meet the requirements of this section.
(4) The Kentucky Department of Education shall:
(a) Adopt administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
ensure the proper enforcement of this section; and
(b) Identify appropriate resources to comply with this section that are free of
charge. Once identified, the department shall list the free resources on the
department's website.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) No later than January 1, 2027, a public postsecondary education institution shall
conspicuously display the Ten Commandments in each classroom of the
institution.
(2) The text of the Ten Commandments shall follow the same minimum requirements
as public schools and public charter schools as established in subsection (2) of
Section 1 of this Act.
(3) A public postsecondary education institution shall not use public funds to
purchase the displays required by this section and shall only accept donated
displays that meet the requirements of this section.
(4) The Council on Postsecondary Education shall:
(a) Adopt administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
ensure the proper enforcement of this section; and
(b) Identify appropriate resources to comply with this section that are free of
charge. Once identified, the department shall list the free resources on the
council's website.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/16/2026 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1565
Section 3. KRS 158.195 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Local boards shall require each public elementary and secondary school to
display the national motto of the United States, "In God We Trust," in a
prominent location in the school.
(b) The display required in paragraph (a) of this subsection may take the form of
but is not limited to a mounted plaque or student artwork.
(2) As used in this section, "prominent location" means a school entryway, cafeteria, or
common area where students are likely to see an item on display.
(3) Local boards may allow any teacher or administrator in a public school district of
the Commonwealth to read or post in a public school building, classroom, or event
any excerpts or portions of any or all of the following historically significant
documents: the national motto; the national anthem; the pledge of allegiance; the
preamble to the Kentucky Constitution; the Declaration of Independence; the
Mayflower Compact; the Ten Commandments, in addition to the display required
by Section 1 of this Act; the writings, speeches, documents, and proclamations of
the founding fathers and presidents of the United States; United States Supreme
Court decisions; and acts of the United States Congress including the published text
of the Congressional Record. There shall be no content-based censorship of
American history or heritage in the Commonwealth based on religious references in
these writings, documents, and records.
(4) Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, local boards shall require each public
school building that contains instructional space for students in grades six (6)
through twelve (12) to conspicuously display in a prominent location, in both
English and Spanish, a printed abstract of KRS 339.210 to 339.450, a list of the
limited or prohibited occupations for minors, and a notice stating the working hours
per day for each day of the week permissible for minors to work. The same
information or display shall also be posted on a district's or school's website.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/16/2026 3:02 PM Jacketed